South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3237.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) There is created the "Weapons Detectors in Schools Study Committee" to study whether it is in the public interest to require the installation and use of weapons detectors, including metal detectors and other means as technology provides, at public schools in this State, taking into consideration, at a minimum, the costs and benefits of the weapons detectors to the residents of this State, potential sources of funding for the weapons detectors, and the feasibility of having each school install and use weapons detectors. (B) The study committee must be comprised of three members of the Senate appointed by the Chairman of the Senate Education Committee, three members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Chairman of the House Education and Public Works Committee, and one member with a background in law enforcement appointed by the State Superintendent of education. The Senate and the House of Representatives members with the greatest seniority in their respective bodies shall serve as cochairs. Vacancies in the study committee's membership must be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in the manner of the original appointment. (C) The Chairmen of the Senate Education and House Education and Public Works Committees shall provide appropriate staffing for the study committee. (D) The study committee shall make a report of its recommendations to the General Assembly within ninety days of the effective date of this joint resolution, at which time the study committee is dissolved. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----